src/morphology/roots/51.lexc
LEXICON 51
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:Alasitta{#}päittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:Alasilta{#}päiltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:Alasilla{#}päillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:Alasille{#}päille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:Alasista{#}päistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:Alasina{#}päinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:Alasien{#}päiden   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:Alasten{#}päiden   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:Alasten{#}päitten   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:Alasissa{#}päissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:Alaset{#}päät Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:Alasia{#}päitä    Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:Alasiksi{#}päikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:Alasiksi{#}päiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:Alasetta{#}päättä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:Alaselta{#}päältä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:Alasella{#}päällä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:Alaselle{#}päälle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:Alasesta{#}päästä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:Alasena{#}päänä   Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:Alasen{#}pään Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:Alasessa{#}päässä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:Alanen{#}pää Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:Alasta{#}päätä  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:Alaseksi{#}pääkse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=Alanen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:Alaseksi{#}pääksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][CASE=CMT]:Isoine-Britannioine  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:Isoitta-Britannioitta  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:Isoilta-Britannioilta  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:Isoilla-Britannioilla  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:Isoille-Britannioille  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:Isoista-Britannioista  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:Isoina-Britannioina  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:Isojen-Britannioiden  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:Isojen-Britannioitten  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:Isojen-Britanniojen  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:Isoissa-Britannioissa  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:Isot-Britanniat  Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:Isoja-Britannioita  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:Isoiksi-Britannioikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:Isoiksi-Britannioiksi  Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:Isotta-Britanniatta  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:Isolta-Britannialta  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:Isolla-Britannialla  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:Isolle-Britannialle  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:Isosta-Britanniasta  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:Isona-Britanniana  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:Ison-Britannian  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:Isossa-Britanniassa  Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:Iso-Britannia  Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:Iso-Britannia  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:Isoa-Britanniaa  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:Isoksi-Britanniakse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Iso-Britannia][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:Isoksi-Britanniaksi  Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:Ylisittä{#}päittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:Ylisiltä{#}päiltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:Ylisillä{#}päillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:Ylisille{#}päille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:Ylisistä{#}päistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:Ylisinä{#}päinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:Ylisien{#}päiden   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:Ylisten{#}päiden   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:Ylisten{#}päitten   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:Ylisissä{#}päissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:Yliset{#}päät Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:Ylisiä{#}päitä    Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:Ylisiksi{#}päikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:Ylisiksi{#}päiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:Ylisettä{#}päättä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:Yliseltä{#}päältä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:Ylisellä{#}päällä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:Yliselle{#}päälle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:Ylisestä{#}päästä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:Ylisenä{#}päänä   Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:Ylisen{#}pään Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:Ylisessä{#}päässä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:Ylinen{#}pää Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:Ylistä{#}päätä  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:Yliseksi{#}pääkse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=Ylinen'|'pää][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:Yliseksi{#}pääksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][CASE=CMT]:aavoine{#}merine Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:aavoitta{#}merittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:aavoilta{#}meriltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:aavoilla{#}merillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:aavoille{#}merille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:aavoissa{#}merissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:aavoina{#}merinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:aavojen{#}merien Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:aavojen{#}merten Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:aavoissa{#}merissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:aavat{#}meret Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:aavoja{#}meriä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:aavoiksi{#}merikse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:aavoiksi{#}meriksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:aavatta{#}merettä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:aavalta{#}mereltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:aavalla{#}merellä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:aavalle{#}merelle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:aavassa{#}meressä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:aavana{#}merenä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:aavan{#}meren Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:aavassa{#}meressä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:aava{#}meri Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:aavaa{#}merta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:aavaksi{#}merekse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=aava'|'meri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:aavaksi{#}mereksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:hienoitta{#}sokereitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:hienoilta{#}sokereilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:hienoilla{#}sokereilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:hienoille{#}sokereille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:hienoista{#}sokereista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:hienoina{#}sokereina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:hienojen{#}sokereiden Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:hienojen{#}sokereitten Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:hienojen{#}sokerien Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:hienoissa{#}sokereissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:hienot{#}sokerit Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:hienoja{#}sokereja Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:hienoiksi{#}sokereikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:hienoiksi{#}sokereiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:hienotta{#}sokeritta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:hienolta{#}sokerilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:hienolla{#}sokerilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=hieno'|'sokeri][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:hienolle{#}sokerille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
